Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 1. Prohibited Acts

Cross references. —

As to penalty for leaving abandoned iceboxes or refrigerators in places easily accessible to children without taking precautions, see §

35-10-407

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality, with respect to accused's rights to information or confrontation, of statute according confidentiality to sex crime victim's communications to sexual counselor, 43 ALR4th 395.

§§ 14-3-101 through 14-3-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to abandonment of child by parent, guardian or custodian, penalty and subsequent convictions, see §

6-4-403

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections derived from Laws 1890-91, ch. 20, § 2, Laws 1895, ch. 46, § 5, and Laws 1957, ch. 220, § 2.

§ 14-3-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

§

14-3-104

, which derived from Laws 1957, ch. 220, § 7, related to penalty for soliciting to engage in illicit sexual relations.

§

14-3-105

, which derived from Laws 1957, ch. 220, § 8, related to penalty for immoral or indecent acts.

§

14-3-106

, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 155, § 1, related to penalties of violation of the restrictions on disclosure of names or publication of information.

§ 14-3-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to offenses against morals generally, see chapter 4 of title 6.

As to sexual battery, see §

6-2-313

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1957, ch. 220, § 8, related to penalty for immoral or indecent acts.

§ 14-3-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 155, § 1, related to penalties of violation of the restrictions on disclosure of names or publication of information.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes or ordinances regulating sexual performance by child, 42 ALR5th 291.

§ 14-3-107.
Performing body-art on persons who have not reached the age of majority; penalties; definition.

No person shall knowingly perform body-art upon or under the skin of a person who has not reached the age of majority, except with the consent of the person’s parent or legal guardian who is present at the time the body-art procedure is performed upon the person. The person performing the body-art procedure shall demand proof of age prior to administering the body-art procedure upon the person. A motor vehicle driver’s license, a registration card issued under the federal Selective Service Act, an identification card issued to a member of the armed forces, a valid United States passport, a tribal identification card issued by the governing body of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe or the Northern Arapaho Tribe or an identification card issued by the department of transportation is prima facie evidence of the age and identity of the person. Proof that the person performing the body-art procedure demanded, was shown and acted in reasonable reliance upon the information contained in any one (1) of the above documents as identification and proof of age is a defense to any criminal prosecution under this section.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

As used in this section:

“Body-art” means the practice of physical body adornment utilizing body piercing, branding, scarification, sculpting or tattooing. This definition does not include practices conducted under the supervision of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Wyoming law nor does this definition include piercing of the outer perimeter or lobe of the ear by means of sterilized stud-and-clasp ear piercing systems;

“Body piercing” means any puncturing or penetration of the skin or mucosa of a person and the insertion of jewelry or other adornment in the opening;

“Branding” means any invasive procedure in which a permanent mark is burned into or onto the skin using either temperature, mechanical or chemical means;

“Scarification” means any invasive procedure in which the intended result is the production of scar tissue on the surface of the skin;

“Sculpting” means any modification of the skin, mucosa, cartilage or tissue of the body for nonmedical purposes;

“Tattoo” means any indelible design, letter, scroll, figure, symbol or any other mark placed upon or under the skin with ink or colors, by the aid of needles or other instruments.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 186, § 1; 2004, ch. 47, § 1; 2005, ch. 130, § 2; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted references pertaining to body-art for references pertaining to tatooing throughout (a); and added (c)(i) through (c)(v), making related changes.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the reference to the tribal identification card in (a).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the third sentence of (a), deleted “of Wyoming” following “Tribe” twice, substituted “Arapaho” for “Arapahoe,” and made stylistic changes.

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

§ 14-3-108.
Use of ultraviolet tanning devices by persons who have not reached the age of majority; presence required; consent required; penalty.

No person other than the minor’s parent or legal guardian shall knowingly allow a minor who has not reached fifteen (15) years of age to use an ultraviolet tanning device, unless the minor’s parent or legal guardian consents in writing to the use and is present the entire time of use. No person shall knowingly allow a minor age fifteen (15) years to the age of majority to use an ultraviolet tanning device, except with written consent obtained from the minor’s parent or legal guardian. Any person other than the minor’s parent or legal guardian allowing the use of an ultraviolet tanning device by a minor shall demand proof of age prior to allowing the use of an ultraviolet tanning device. A motor vehicle driver’s license, a registration card issued under the federal Selective Service Act, an identification card issued to a member of the armed forces, a valid United States passport, a tribal identification card issued by the governing body of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe or the Northern Arapaho Tribe or an identification card issued by the department of transportation is prima facie evidence of the age and identity under this section. Proof that the person allowing the use of the ultraviolet tanning device demanded, was shown and acted in reasonable reliance upon the information contained in any one (1) of the above documents as identification and proof of age is a defense to any criminal prosecution under this section.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

As used in this section:

“Consent” means that the parent or legal guardian appears at the first time the minor uses the ultraviolet tanning device and signs a written consent form in the presence of the owner or an employee of the facility. The minor’s parent or legal guardian may withdraw this consent at any time. Unless so withdrawn, this consent shall be valid for twelve (12) months from the date the written consent form is signed. The parent or legal guardian must repeat the written consent process annually until the minor reaches the age of majority;

“Present” means being physically present at the facility at which the tanning device is being used, but does not require the presence in the tanning room or booth being used;

“Ultraviolet tanning device” means equipment that emits electromagnetic radiation with wavelengths in the air between two hundred (200) and four hundred (400) nanometers used for tanning of the skin, including, but not limited to, a sunlamp, tanning booth or tanning bed, but does not include equipment that emits ultraviolet radiation used by a health care professional in the treatment of disease or used pursuant to a prescription.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 114, § 1; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the fourth sentence of (a), deleted “of Wyoming” following “Tribe” twice, substituted “Arapaho” for “Arapahoe,” and made stylistic changes.

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).